Hawaii statutes.
[§383-92.5] Worker profiling. The
department shall establish and utilize a system of profiling all new claimants
for regular compensation in compliance with section 4 of the Unemployment
Compensation Amendments of 1993 (P.L. 103-152) that:

(1) Identifies which claimants will be likely to
exhaust regular compensation and will need job search assistance services to
make a successful transition to new employment;

(2) Refers claimants identified pursuant to paragraph
(1) to reemployment services, such as job search assistance services, available
under any state or federal law;

(3) Collects follow-up information relating to the
services received by these claimants and the employment outcomes for these
claimants subsequent to receiving the services, and utilizes this information
in making identifications pursuant to paragraph (1); and

(4) Meets other requirements that the Secretary of
Labor deems appropriate. [L 1994, c 112, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next